test/test_028/model.aff
wordchars	a	A
wordchars	[bc]	[BC]
wordchars	[de]	[DE]
wordchars	[f-i]	[F-I]
wordchars	[j-n]	[J-N]
wordchars	o	O
wordchars	[p-s]	[P-S]
wordchars	[tu]	[TU]
wordchars	[v-y]	[V-Y]
wordchars	z	Z

prefixes

flag *A:
    .		>	RE			# As in enter > reenter

flag *I:
    .		>	IN			# As in disposed > indisposed

flag *U:
    .		>	UN			# As in natural > unnatural

suffixes

flag V:
    E		>	-E,IVE		# As in create > creative
    [^E]	>	IVE			# As in prevent > preventive

flag *N:
    E		>	-E,ION		# As in create > creation
    Y		>	-Y,ICATION	# As in multiply > multiplication
    [^EY]	>	EN			# As in fall > fallen

flag *X:
    E		>	-E,IONS		# As in create > creations
    Y		>	-Y,ICATIONS	# As in multiply > multiplications
    [^EY]	>	ENS			# As in weak > weakens

flag H:
    Y		>	-Y,IETH		# As in twenty > twentieth
    [^Y]	>	TH			# As in hundred > hundredth

flag *Y:
    Y		>	-Y,ILY		# As in messy > messily
    [^Y]	>	LY			# As in quick > quickly

flag *G:
    E		>	-E,ING		# As in file > filing
    [^E]	>	ING			# As in cross > crossing

flag *J:
    E		>	-E,INGS		# As in file > filings
    [^E]	>	INGS		# As in cross > crossings

flag *D:
    E		>	D			# As in create > created
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IED	# As in imply > implied
    [^EY]	>	ED			# As in cross > crossed
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ED		# As in convey > conveyed

flag T:
    E		>	ST			# As in late > latest
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IEST	# As in dirty > dirtiest
    [AEIOU]Y	>	EST		# As in gray > grayest
    [^EY]	>	EST			# As in small > smallest

flag *R:
    E		>	R			# As in skate > skater
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IER	# As in multiply > multiplier
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ER		# As in convey > conveyer
    [^EY]	>	ER			# As in build > builder

flag *Z:
    E		>	RS			# As in skate > skaters
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IERS	# As in multiply > multipliers
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ERS		# As in convey > conveyers
    [^EY]	>	ERS			# As in build > builders

flag *S:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IES	# As in imply > implies
    [AEIOU]Y	>	S		# As in convey > conveys
    [CST]H	>	ES			# As in lash > lashes  (some TH's...)
    [^CST]H	>	S			# As in cough > coughs
    [SXZ]	>	ES			# As in fix > fixes
    [^SXZHY]	>	S		# As in bat > bats

flag *P:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,INESS	# As in cloudy > cloudiness
    [AEIOU]Y	>	NESS	# As in gray > grayness
    [^Y]	>	NESS		# As in late > lateness

flag *M:
    .		>	'S			# As in dog > dog's
